Hawaii, session 2026, SB663.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to establish positions within the university of Hawaii at Manoa college of tropical agriculture and human resources to successfully carry out the college's mission of agricultural research; support the State's highly valued agriculture industry in the face of current challenges, including damaging pests, diseases, climate change, and production issues; and connect research stations to communities through education, entrepreneurship, and farming opportunities for local families and keiki. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the university of Hawaii at Manoa college of tropical agriculture and human resources to be allocated as follows: (1)  $ to establish eight full-time equivalent (8.0 FTE) agricultural technician positions; and (2)  $ to establish four full-time equivalent (4.0 FTE) community coordinator positions. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________